en: Light Therapy Lamps
xx: Light Therapy Lamps
cs: Lampy pro světelnou terapii
da: Lamper til lysterapi
de: Lichttherapielampen
es: Lámparas para terapia de iluminación
fr: Lampes de luminothérapie
it: Lampade per terapia luminosa
ja: 光線療法用ランプ
nl: Lichttherapielampen
no: Lysterapilamper
pl: Lampy terapeutyczne
pt: Lâmpadas para luminoterapia
ru: Лапмы для фототерапии
sv: Ljusterapilampor
tr: Işık Terapisi Lambaları

en: Medical Alarm Systems
xx: Medical Alarm Systems
cs: Zdravotnické alarmy
da: Medicinske alarmsystemer
de: Hausnotrufgeräte
es: Sistemas de alarma médica
fr: Systèmes d'alarme médicale
it: Sistemi di allarme medici
ja: 個人向け緊急対応システム
nl: Medische alarmsystemen
no: Medisinske alarmsystemer
pl: Systemy alarmów medycznych
pt: Sistemas de alarme hospitalar
ru: Системы вызова неотложной медпомощи
sv: Medicinska larmsystem
tr: Medikal Alarm Sistemleri

en: Medical Identification Tags & Jewelry
xx: Medical Identification Tags & Jewelry
cs: Zdravotnické identifikační štítky a doplňky
da: Medicinske identifikationsmærker og smykker
de: Notfall-Armband
es: Etiquetas de identificación y joyería médica\, joyería para id médica
fr: Bijoux et étiquettes d'identification médicale
it: Targhette o braccialetti di identificazione per uso medico
ja: 医療識別票
nl: Medische identificatieplaatjes en -sieraden
no: Medisinske ID-merker og -smykker
pl: Plakietki i biżuteria z informacjami medycznymi
pt: Etiquetas de identificação hospitalar
ru: Медицинские идентификаторы
sv: Medicinska ID-brickor och smycken
tr: Medikal Kimlik Etiket ve Takıları

en: Medical Tests
xx: Medical Tests
cs: Zdravotnické testy
da: Medicinske tests
de: Medizinische Tests
es: Pruebas médicas
fr: Tests médicaux
it: Test medici
ja: 医療用検査器・検査薬
nl: Medische tests
no: Medisinske tester
pl: Testy medyczne
pt: Testes médicos
ru: Диагностические тесты
sv: Medicinska tester
tr: Tıbbi Testler

en: Allergy Test Kits
xx: Allergy Test Kits
cs: Sady pro testování na alergie
da: Allergitestsæt
de: Allergietest-Sets
es: Kits de pruebas de alergia
fr: Kits de tests d'allergies
it: Kit di test allergenici
ja: アレルギー テスト キット
nl: Testsets voor allergieën
no: Testsett for allergi
pl: Zestawy do wykrywania alergii
pt: Kits para testes alérgicos
ru: Наборы для диагностики аллергии
sv: Kit för allergitest
tr: Alerji Testi Araçları

en: Blood Typing Test Kits
xx: Blood Typing Test Kits
cs: Testy na zjištění krevní skupiny
da: Blodtypetestsæt
de: Blutgruppentests
es: Kits de pruebas para tipología sanguínea
fr: Kits de détermination du groupe sanguin
it: Kit per test del gruppo sanguigno
ja: 血液型検査キット
nl: Sets voor bloedgroeptesten
no: Testsett for blodtype
pl: Testy do badania grupy krwi
pt: Kits de exame de tipagem sanguínea
ru: Наборы для определения группы крови
sv: Testkit för blodtyp
tr: Kan Grubu Test Setleri

en: Drug Tests
xx: Drug Tests
cs: Drogové testy
da: Narkotikatests
de: Drogentests
es: Pruebas para la detección de drogas
fr: Tests de dépistage des drogues
it: Test antidroga
ja: 薬物検査
nl: Drugstests
no: Narkotikatester
pl: Testy narkotykowe
pt: Testes de droga
ru: Тесты на наркотики
sv: Drogtester
tr: Uyuşturucu Testleri

en: HIV Tests
xx: HIV Tests
cs: Testy na HIV
da: HIV-test
de: HIV-Tests
es: Pruebas del VIH
fr: Tests de dépistage du VIH
it: Test HIV
ja: HIV検査
nl: HIV-testen
no: HIV-tester
pl: Testy wykrywające HIV
pt: Testes de HIV
ru: Анализы на ВИЧ
sv: HIV-test
tr: HIV Testleri

en: Pregnancy Tests
xx: Pregnancy Tests
cs: Těhotenské testy
da: Graviditetstest
de: Schwangerschaftstests
es: Pruebas de embarazo
fr: Tests de grossesse
it: Test di gravidanza
ja: 妊娠検査薬
nl: Zwangerschapstests
no: Graviditetstester
pl: Testy ciążowe
pt: Testes de gravidez
ru: Тесты на беременность
sv: Graviditetstest
tr: Gebelik Testleri

en: Urinary Tract Infection Tests
xx: Urinary Tract Infection Tests
cs: Testování infekcí močových cest
da: Tests til påvisning af inficerede urinveje
de: Harnwegsinfektionstests
es: Pruebas de infección del tracto urinario
fr: Tests d'infection urinaire
it: Test per infezioni delle vie urinarie
ja: 尿路感染症検査薬
nl: Tests voor urineweginfecties
no: Test for urinveisinfeksjon
pl: Testy do wykrywania infekcji dróg moczowych
pt: Testes de infecções do trato urinário
ru: Тесты для диагностики инфекций мочевыводящих путей
sv: Urinvägsinfektionstest
tr: İdrar Yolu Enfeksiyonu Testleri

en: Medicine & Drugs
xx: Medicine & Drugs
cs: Léčivé přípravky a léky
da: Medicin og medicinalvarer
de: Medikamente & Arzneimittel
es: Medicinas y medicamentos
fr: Médicaments
it: Medicina e farmaci
ja: 医薬品
nl: Medicijnen en geneesmiddelen
no: Medisin og legemidler
pl: Lekarstwa
pt: Medicamentos
ru: Медикаменты и лекарства
sv: Medicin och läkemedel
tr: İlaçlar

en: Paracetamol tablets
fr: Comprimés de paracétamol

en: Cough & Cold Remedies
de: Husten- & Erkältungsmittel

en: Pain Relief Tablets
es: Tabletas para el alivio del dolor
fr: Comprimés contre la douleur
it: Compresse per il sollievo dal dolore
nl: Pijnstillende tabletten
pl: Tabletki przeciwbólowe
sv: Smärtstillande tabletter

en: Mobility & Accessibility
xx: Mobility & Accessibility
cs: Omezená pohyblivost a bezbariérový přístup
da: Bevægelighed og mobilitet
de: Senioren- & Behindertenbedarf
es: Movilidad y accesibilidad
fr: Mobilité et accessibilité
it: Mobilità e accessibilità
ja: 移動補助具・生活補助具
nl: Mobiliteit en toegankelijkheid
no: Mobilitet og tilgjengelighet
pl: Artykuły dla osób mających trudności z poruszaniem się
pt: Mobilidade e acessibilidade
ru: Товары для обеспечения мобильности инвалидов
sv: Rörlighet och tillgänglighet
tr: Mobilite ve Kolay Erişim

en: Accessibility Equipment
xx: Accessibility Equipment
cs: Pomůcky pro invalidy
da: Mobilitetsudstyr
de: Zubehör & Bedarf zur Barrierefreiheit
es: Equipo de accesibilidad
fr: Matériel d'accessibilité
it: Ausili accessibilità
ja: 生活補助具
nl: Toegankelijkheidsapparatuur
no: Fremkommelighetsutstyr
pl: Sprzęt ułatwiający poruszanie się
pt: Equipamento de acessibilidade
ru: Инвалидная техника
sv: Tillgänglighetsutrustning
tr: Erişim Ekipmanları

en: Mobility Scooters
xx: Mobility Scooters
cs: Skútry
da: El-scootere
de: Elektromobile
es: Scooters eléctricos
fr: Scooters de mobilité
it: Scooter per anziani e disabili
ja: 電動カート
nl: Scootmobielen
no: Kjøretøy for bevegelseshemmede
pl: Skutery inwalidzkie
pt: Scooters elétricos
ru: Скутеры для инвалидов
sv: Permobiler
tr: Akülü Engelli Araçları

en: Stair Lifts
xx: Stair Lifts
cs: Výtahy na schody
da: Trappelifte
de: Treppenlifte
es: Salvaescaleras
fr: Monte-escaliers
it: Montascale
ja: 階段昇降機
nl: Trapliften
no: Trappeheiser
pl: Platformy przyschodowe
pt: Cadeiras elevadoras
ru: Лестничные подъемники
sv: Trapphissar
tr: Merdiven Asansörleri

en: Transfer Boards & Sheets
xx: Transfer Boards & Sheets
cs: Přesouvací podložky
da: Flyttebrætter og glidepuder
de: Umlagerungsbretter & -tücher
es: Sábanas y tablas de traslado
fr: Planches et alèses de transfert
it: Tavole e teli di trasferimento
ja: トランスファーボード・シート
nl: Draagbaren
no: Forflytningsbrett og -laken
pl: Deski transferowe i maty do przenoszenia
pt: Placas e lençóis para transferência de pacientes
ru: Доски и простыни для перемещения пациентов
sv: Förflyttningsbrädor och -lakan
tr: Nakil Tahtaları ve Çarşafları

en: Wheelchairs
xx: Wheelchairs
cs: Vozíky
da: Kørestole
de: Rollstühle
es: Sillas de ruedas
fr: Fauteuils roulants, Fauteuil roulant
it: Sedie a rotelle
ja: 車椅子
nl: Rolstoelen
no: Rullestoler
pl: Wózki inwalidzkie
pt: Cadeiras de rodas
ru: Кресла-коляски
sv: Rullstolar
tr: Tekerlekli Sandalyeler